Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.50.844

Exceptional faculty awards—Eligibility of foundation for matching funds—Endowment fund management.

A foundation is not eligible to receive matching funds under RCW 28B.50.835 through 28B.50.843 unless the foundation and the board of trustees of the college for whose benefit the foundation exists have entered into a contract, approved by the attorney general, that: (1) Specifies the services to be provided by the foundation; (2) provides for protection of the community and technical college exceptional awards endowment funds under the foundation's control; and (3) provides for the college's assumption of ownership, management, and control of such funds if the foundation ceases to exist or function properly, or fails to provide the specified services in accordance with the contract.

The principal of the community and technical college exceptional awards endowment fund managed by the foundation shall not be invaded. Funds recovered by a college under this section shall be deposited into the college's local endowment fund. For purposes of this section, community and technical college exceptional awards endowment funds include the private donations, state matching funds, and any accrued interest on such donations and matching funds.

[ 1993 c 87 s 4.]